Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.040

College districts enumerated.

The state of Washington is hereby divided into thirty college districts as follows:

(1) The first district shall encompass the counties of Clallam and Jefferson;

(2) The second district shall encompass the counties of Grays Harbor and Pacific;

(3) The third district shall encompass the counties of Kitsap and Mason;

(4) The fourth district shall encompass the counties of San Juan, Skagit and Island;

(5) The fifth district shall encompass Snohomish county except for the Northshore common school district and that portion encompassed by the twenty-third district created in subsection (23) of this section: PROVIDED, That the fifth district shall encompass the Everett Community College;

(6) The sixth district shall encompass the present boundaries of the common school districts of Seattle and Vashon Island, King county;

(7) The seventh district shall encompass the present boundary of the common school district of Shoreline in King county;

(8) The eighth district shall encompass the present boundaries of the common school districts of Bellevue, Issaquah, Mercer Island, Skykomish and Snoqualmie, King county;

(9) The ninth district shall encompass the present boundaries of the common school districts of Federal Way, Highline and South Central, King county;

(10) The tenth district shall encompass the present boundaries of the common school districts of Auburn, Black Diamond, Renton, Enumclaw, Kent, Lester and Tahoma, King county, and the King county portion of Puyallup common school district No. 3;

(11) The eleventh district shall encompass all of Pierce county, except for the present boundaries of the common school districts of Tacoma and Peninsula;

(12) The twelfth district shall encompass Lewis county, the Rochester common school district No. 401, the Tenino common school district No. 402 of Thurston county, and the Thurston county portion of the Centralia common school district No. 401;

(13) The thirteenth district shall encompass the counties of Cowlitz, and Wahkiakum;

(14) The fourteenth district shall encompass the counties of Clark, Skamania and that portion of Klickitat county not included in the sixteenth district;

(15) The fifteenth district shall encompass the counties of Chelan, Douglas and Okanogan;

(16) The sixteenth district shall encompass the counties of Kittitas, Yakima, and that portion of Klickitat county included in United States census divisions 1 through 4;

(17) The seventeenth district shall encompass the counties of Ferry, Lincoln (except consolidated school district 105-157-166J and the Lincoln county portion of common school district 167-202), Pend Oreille, Spokane, Stevens and Whitman;

(18) The eighteenth district shall encompass the counties of Adams and Grant, and that portion of Lincoln county comprising consolidated school district 105-157-166J and common school district 167-202;

(19) The nineteenth district shall encompass the counties of Benton and Franklin;

(20) The twentieth district shall encompass the counties of Asotin, Columbia, Garfield and Walla Walla;

(21) The twenty-first district shall encompass Whatcom county;

(22) The twenty-second district shall encompass the present boundaries of the common school districts of Tacoma and Peninsula, Pierce county;

(23) The twenty-third district shall encompass that portion of Snohomish county within such boundaries as the state board for community and technical colleges shall determine: PROVIDED, That the twenty-third district shall encompass the Edmonds Community College;

(24) The twenty-fourth district shall encompass all of Thurston county except the Rochester common school district No. 401, the Tenino common school district No. 402, and the Thurston county portion of the Centralia common school district No. 401;

(25) The twenty-fifth district shall encompass all of Whatcom county;

(26) The twenty-sixth district shall encompass the Northshore, Lake Washington, Bellevue, Mercer Island, Issaquah, Riverview, Snoqualmie Valley and Skykomish school districts;

(27) The twenty-seventh district shall encompass the Renton, Kent, Auburn, Tahoma, and Enumclaw school districts and a portion of the Seattle school district described as follows: Commencing at a point established by the intersection of the Duwamish river and the south boundary of the Seattle Community College District (number six) and thence north along the centerline of the Duwamish river to the west waterway; thence north along the centerline of the west waterway to Elliot Bay; thence along Elliot Bay to a line established by the intersection of the extension of Denny Way to Elliot Bay; thence east along the line established by the centerline of Denny Way to Lake Washington; thence south along the shoreline of Lake Washington to the south line of the Seattle Community College District; and thence west along the south line of the Seattle Community College District to the point of beginning;

(28) The twenty-eighth district shall encompass all of Pierce county;

(29) The twenty-ninth district shall encompass all of Pierce county; and

(30) The thirtieth district shall encompass the present boundaries of the common school districts of Lake Washington and Riverview in King county and Northshore in King and Snohomish counties.

[ 1994 c 217 s 2; 1991 c 238 s 23; 1988 c 77 s 1; 1981 c 72 s 1; 1973 1st ex.s. c 46 s 7; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.50.040. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 8 s 4. Formerly RCW 28.85.040.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 217: See note following RCW 28B.45.0201.

Findings—1994 c 217: See RCW 28B.45.0201.

Effective date—1988 c 77: "Section 2 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately. The remainder of this act shall take effect July 1, 1988." [ 1988 c 77 s 12.]

Severability—1988 c 77: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1988 c 77 s 11.]

District No. 23 Interlocal cooperation agreements by school districts in Snohomish county authorized—1981 c 72: "Any school district within Snohomish county may enter into interlocal cooperation agreements with any community college located within Snohomish county pursuant to the provisions of chapter 39.34 RCW." [ 1981 c 72 s 8.]

Savings—Provisions of existing collective bargaining agreement—1981 c 72: "Nothing contained in this amendatory act shall be construed to alter any provision of any existing collective bargaining agreement until any such agreement has expired or been modified pursuant to chapter 28B.52 RCW." [ 1981 c 72 s 9.]

Savings—Generally—1981 c 72: "Nothing in this amendatory act shall be construed to affect any existing rights, nor as affecting any actions, activities, or proceedings validated prior to the effective date of this amendatory act, nor as affecting any civil or criminal proceedings, nor any rule, regulation, or order promulgated, nor any administrative action taken prior to the effective date of this amendatory act, and the validity of any act performed with respect to Edmonds Community College, or any officer or employee thereof prior to the effective date of this amendatory act, is hereby validated." [ 1981 c 72 s 10.]

Effective date of this amendatory act defined—1981 c 72: "The phrase "the effective date of this amendatory act" as used in sections 3, 4, 6 and 10 of this amendatory act shall mean July 1, 1981: PROVIDED, That nothing in this amendatory act shall prohibit any transfers mandated in section 4 hereof nor the action contemplated in section 11 hereof prior to such July 1, 1981." [ 1981 c 72 s 12.]

Severability—1981 c 72: "If any provision of this amendatory act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1981 c 72 s 13.]

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 46: See note following RCW 28B.10.704.